lexc/copula.lexc
!***** copula.lexc *****
! Th. Fransen, 18/08/19

!\\\\\ DECLARE MULTICHAR SYMBOLS /////

Multichar_Symbols

! *UPPER symbols (Tags)*

+
+1P
+2P
+3P
+ABS
+AUG
+COND
+CONJ
+CONJ_PART
+CONSUETUD
+COP
+DEPEND
+FUT
+IPF
+IMP
+IND
+LEN
+NEG
+PAST
+PL
+PRS
+REL
+SG
+SUBJ
+VROOT

!\\\\\ BEGIN CONTINUATION CLASSES /////

!*** Root = start ***

LEXICON Root
	Independent;
	Prefix;

LEXICON Independent
	Present;
	Imperative;
	presSubj;
	pastSubj;
	Future;
	Conditional;
	Past;
	
LEXICON Prefix
							Dependent;
ní+CONJ_PART+NEG:ní			Dependent;
							depImp;
ná+CONJ_PART+IMP+NEG:ná		depImp;
	
LEXICON Dependent
	depPres;
	depCons;
	depPresSubj;
	depPastSubj;
	depFut;
	depCond;
	depPast;
	
LEXICON Present
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+1P+SG:am			#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+2P+SG:at			#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+2P+SG:it			#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+SG:is			#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+SG+REL:as		#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+1P+PL:ammi			#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+1P+PL:ammin		#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+2P+PL:adi			#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+2P+PL:adib			#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+PL:it			#;
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+PL+REL:ata		#; 
is+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+PL+REL:at		#; 

LEXICON Imperative
bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+2P+SG+LEN:ba		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+3P+SG+LEN:bed		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+3P+SG+LEN:bad		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+1P+PL+LEN:baan		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+1P+PL+LEN:ban		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+2P+PL+LEN:bed		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+2P+PL+LEN:bad		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+3P+PL+LEN:bat		#;

LEXICON presSubj
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+1P+SG:ba				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+2P+SG:ba				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+2P+SG:be				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+3P+SG:ba				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+3P+SG+REL:bes			#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+3P+SG+REL:bas			#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+2P+PL:bede			#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+3P+PL+REL+LEN:bete	#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+3P+PL+REL+LEN:beta	#;

LEXICON pastSubj
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+SG+LEN:bed			#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+SG+LEN:bad			#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+SG+LEN:bid			#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+1P+PL:bemmis				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+PL:betis				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+PL:bitis				#;
ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+COND+3P+PL:roptis	#;

LEXICON Future
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+1P+SG:be				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+2P+SG:be				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+SG:bid				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+SG+REL+LEN:bes		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+SG+REL+LEN:bas		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+1P+PL:bimmi			#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+1P+PL:bemmi			#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+PL:bit				#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+PL+REL+LEN:beta		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+PL+REL+LEN:bat		#;

LEXICON Conditional
bí+VROOT+COP+COND+3P+SG+LEN:bed		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+COND+3P+PL:beitis		#;

LEXICON Past
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+1P+SG:basa	#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+SG:ba		#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+PL:batir	#;
bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+PL:batar	#;

ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+1P+SG:ro-bsa			#;
ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+2P+SG:ro-psa			#;
ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+SG+LEN:ro-po		#;
ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+SG+LEN:ro-bo		#;
ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+SG+LEN:ro-pu		#;
ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+SG+LEN:ro-bu		#;
ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+PL:ro-bummar			#;
ro+AUG+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+PL:ro-ptar			#;

LEXICON depPres
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+1P+SG+LEN:-ta		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+1P+SG+LEN:-da		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+2P+SG+LEN:-ta		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+2P+SG+LEN:-da		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+1P+PL+LEN:-tan		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+1P+PL+LEN:-dan		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+2P+PL+LEN:-tad		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+2P+PL+LEN:-dad		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+PL+LEN:-tat		#;
+DEPEND+tá+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+3P+PL+LEN:-dat		#;

LEXICON depImp
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+3P+SG+LEN:-bad		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+2P+PL+LEN:-bad		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+IMP+3P+PL+LEN:-bat		#;

LEXICON depCons
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+3P+SG:-bi	#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+3P+SG:-pi	#;

LEXICON depPresSubj
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+1P+SG+LEN:-ba		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+2P+SG:-ba			#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+1P+PL:-ban		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+2P+PL:-bad		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+3P+PL+LEN:-pat	#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PRS+SUBJ+3P+PL+LEN:-bat	#;

LEXICON depPastSubj
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+1P+SG:-benn		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+1P+SG:-bin		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+2P+SG:-ptha		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+SG+LEN:-bed	#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+SG+LEN:-bad	#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+1P+PL:-bimmis	#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+PL:-btis		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+SUBJ+3P+PL:-ptis		#;

LEXICON depFut
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+SG:-ba		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+SG:-pa		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+FUT+3P+PL:-bat		#;

LEXICON depCond
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+COND+3P+SG+LEN:-bad	#;

LEXICON depPast
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+1P+SG:-psa		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+SG+LEN:-bu		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+SG+LEN:-pu		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+SG+LEN:-bo		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+SG+LEN:-po		#;
+DEPEND+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+PL:-btar		#;

+DEPEND+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+1P+SG:-rbsa		#;
+DEPEND+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+SG+LEN:-rbo		#;
+DEPEND+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+SG+LEN:-rbu		#;
+DEPEND+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+1P+PL:-rbommar		#;
+DEPEND+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+COP+PAST+3P+PL:-rbtar		#;
